Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 3. Nomination of Electors

§ 2721.
Nomination of presidential electors.

In presidential election years, presidential electors for major political parties shall be nominated at the party platform convention held pursuant to this title.
Electors for all other presidential candidates shall be nominated pursuant to chapter 49, subchapter 3 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 1980.

§ 2722.
Certification of nominees for electors.

After adjournment of the platform convention of a major political party, the chair and secretary of the convention shall promptly execute a sworn statement certifying the names, towns of residence, and correct mailing addresses of the persons nominated by the convention to serve as electors, and shall promptly file the statement with the Secretary of State, along with the written consent of each person to be a nominee for elector.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 1980.